runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
адвокувати/Z|
алергізувати/Z|w
антисептувати/Z|w
асфальтуватися/Z|w
балотувати/Z|wO
безчестити/Z|Lw
бликнути/Z
боротися/Z|w
брязкотіти/Z|w
бурчати/Z|w
вапнити/Z|
ввергнутися/Z
вглядіти/ZL
вдерти/Zn
вередитися/Z|
взаємознищити/Z
вибасувати/Z
вибубнювати/Z|w
вивихувати/Z|w
вигашувати/Z|w
вигострювати/Z|w(
виділитися/ZM
виживити/Z
виказати/Z(
виколихати/Z([
викривлювати/Z|w(
вилежувати/Z|w
вилюднити/ZO
вимірити/ZL
винагородитися/ZM
випарувати/Z(O
випльовуватися/Z|w
випресовувати/Z|w
виригувати/Z|w
висваритися/ZM
висковзнутися/Z
висновувати/Z|w
вистромлюватися/Z|w
вительбушити/ZLO
виточити/ZMO
витятися/Z
вихльоскувати/Z|w
вицятковуватися/Z|w
вишаруватися/Z
вишугувати/Z|w
відборонитися/Z
відвильнути/Z
відговоритися/Z
віддзьобувати/Z|w
відзнімкувати/Z
відклекотіти/Z
відкричати/Z
відлунювати/Z|w
відмолоджуватися/Z|w
відпанувати/Z
відполоскати/Z(
відрегулюватися/Z
відсвіжитися/Z
відставати/Z|w
відсьорбувати/Z|w
відтяти/Zn
відхукувати/Z|w
відшвартовувати/Z|w
відщипуватися/Z|w
вкарбуватися/Z
вкошувати/Z|w
вловлюватися/Z|w
вмолочувати/Z|w
волинити/Z
впаювати/Z|w(
впокоїтися/ZL
враховувати/Z|w(
всаджуватися/Z|w
всотувати/Z|w(
втамовувати/Z|w
втонути/Z
вуалюватися/Z|w
вшиковувати/Z|w
галасувати/Z|w
гвинтити/ZM|w
гицлювати/Z|w
гніздувати/Z|w
госпіталізовувати/Z|w
гримуватися/Z|w
гуркотати/Z|w
дегумувати/Z|wO
декодувати/Z|wO
деморалізовувати/Z|w
дернувати/Z|w
джерґотати/Z|w
директорувати/Z|w
дізнаватися/Z|w
довалювати/Z|w(
догвинчувати/Z|w(
додовбувати/Z|w
доквашувати/Z|w(
документалізувати/Z|wO
домальовуватися/Z|w
донизувати/Z|w
допасуватися/Z
допрацьовувати/Z|w
досадувати/Z|w
досмолити/ZOM
дотелефонуватися/Z
дофантазуватися/Z
драматизувати/Z|wO
дудіти/Z|w
екстерналізувати/Z|w
еякулювати/Z|w
жовнірувати/Z|w
зааплодувати/Z
забарвлювати/Z|w(
заборонити/ZMO
забулькотіти/Z
завалідуватися/Z
завихорити/ZO
заворкувати/Z
заганьбитися/ZM
загіпсовуватися/Z|w
заголювати/Z|w(
загрозити/ZOM
задекоровувати/Z|w(
задівуватися/Z
задурманюватися/Z|w
зазнайомлюватися/Z|w
закабалити/ZMO
заквапитися/Z
заклечувати/Z|w
заколювати/Z|w(
закорковуватися/Z|w
закрикувати/Z|w(
закумулюватися/Z
залебедіти/Z
залупитися/Z
заманювати/Z|w(
замиловувати/Z|
замолочувати/Z|w
замуровувати/Z|w(
занімувати/Z
заощадитися/Z
запацьоритися/Z
запікувати/Z|w
заповзятися/Z
започатися/Z
запропаститися/Z
зареготати/Z
зародитися/ZM
засвистіти/Z
заскавчати/ZM
заслуговувати/Z|w
засновуватися/Z|w
застандартуватися/Z
застромитися/Z
затавруватися/Z
затинькувати/ZO
заторохтіти/Z
затуплювати/Z|w(
зафарбовуватися/Z|w
захиститися/ZM
захрупотіти/Z
зацокотати/Z
зачислювати/Z|w(
зашелюгувати/Z
зашморгувати/Z|w
заштрихувати/ZO
заюшувати/Z|w
збезчеститися/Z
зброджуватися/Z|w
звербувати/ZO
зволожуватися/Z|w
зглузувати/Z
згукнути/Z
здиблюватися/Z|w
здружуватися/Z|w
зіжмакувати/Z|w
зіткнути/Z
злобувати/Z|w
змальовувати/Z|w(
змінюватися/Z|w
змоторизувати/ZO
зневолити/ZO
знепилювати/Z|w
знешкодитися/ZL
зодягнути/ZOn
зремонтувати/ZO
зруйнуватися/Z
зцідитися/Z
іконізувати/Z|wO
інкапсулюватися/Z|w
інтернувати/Z|wO
йонізувати/Z|wO
капризуватися/Z|w
квитувати/Z|w
клинцюватися/Z|w
колесити/Z|w
компостуватися/Z|w
контратипувати/Z|w
коронувати/Z|wO
кректіти/Z|w
крякати/Z|[Q
лагодитися/Z|wL
лесувати/Z|wO
ловитися/ZM|w
лящати/Z|w
маритися/Z|
меліоруватися/Z|w
мієлінізувати/Z|wO
модернізовувати/Z|w
мружитися/Z|wL
набешкетувати/Z
навалюватися/Z|w
наворсувати/ZO
наголоситися/ZM
надвезти/ZO
надкувати/ZO
надсікти/ZO
назбируватися/Z|w
наквашувати/Z|w
накочуватися/Z|w
налакувати/ZO
намагнетизувати/ZO
намішуватися/Z|w
нап'яти/Zn
наплакатися/Z
напривозити/ZL
нарепетуватися/Z
насинюватися/Z|w
насовувати/Z|w
настроїти/ZLO
натовкти/ZO
нафарбовуватися/Z|w
нацупити/Z
нашпиговуватися/Z|w
недовиробити/ZMO
недолюблювати/Z|w(
недорозрахувати/ZO
нервувати/Z|w
нюхнути/Z
обвантажити/ZO
обгортувати/Z|w
обізвати/Z(
обкручуватися/Z|w
облічити/ZMO
обмізковуватися/Z|w
оборонити/ZOM
обреготатися/Z
обсмажитися/ZL
обтискувати/Z|w
обчистити/ZLO
ограновуватися/Z|w
одружувати/Z|w(
озлобити/ZOM
окреслюватися/Z|w
оновлювати/Z|w(
опоганитися/ZL
опротестовувати/Z|w
освічуватися/Z|w
осмолюватися/Z|w
отоварювати/Z|w(
оцинковувати/Z|w(
падкувати/Z|w
парувати/Z|wO
переасигновуватися/Z|w
перев'ючити/ZL
перевідступити/Z
перегиджувати/Z|w(
перегруповувати/Z|w(
передректи/ZO
перезарахувати/ZO
перекаламучувати/Z|w
перекомпоновувати/Z|w(
перекрохмалювати/Z|w
переллятися/Z
перемежовувати/Z|w(
перемочувати/Z|w(
перенівечити/ZLO
переорганізуватися/Z
перепильнувати/Z
перепозиціонувати/ZO
перепрописатися/Z
перерозподілитися/ZM
перескубувати/Z|w
перестояти/Z
перетерпіти/Z
перетушовувати/Z|w
перехлюпнутися/Z
перешіптуватися/Z|w
пильнуватися/Z|w
підвалити/ZMO
підгоріти/Z
підімкнутися/Z
підкоротити/ZMO
підлащитися/ZL
підміситися/ZM
підпарувати/ZO
підремонтувати/ZO
підсіяти/Z(
підстрілити/ZLO
підтоптувати/Z|w
підчищувати/Z|w
платитися/ZM|
побайдикувати/Z
побрехати/Z
повдавлювати/Z(
повикопувати/Z(
повиполювати/Z(
повиучувати/Z(
повідписуватися/Z
поволочитися/ZM
погіршити/ZO
погратулювати/Z
подесятеритися/Z
подоїтися/Z
подумувати/Zw
позавойовувати/Z
позакушувати/Z(
позарівнювати/Z(
позаціловувати/Z
позиціювати/Z|wO
позсукувати/Z
покинутися/Z
покормити/ZOM
покрутнутися/Z
полінитися/ZM
пом'яти/Zn
помістити/ZMO
понавигадувати/Z(
понакреслювати/Z(
понарізуватися/Z
понехтувати/Z
пообкошувати/Z(
пообурюватися/Z
попалахкотати/Z
поперекручувати/Z(
попереходити/ZL
попідпалювати/Z(
попокричати/Z
поприїздити/Z
поранити/ZLO
порозкуркулювати/Z(
портувати/Z|wO
послабувати/Z
постригти/ZO
потренувати/Z
похльоскувати/Z|w
пошарувати/ZO
приахкувати/Z|w
пригоїти/ZOL
прикормлювати/Z|w(
примірювати/Z|w
приписати/Z(
прислуговувати/Z|w
притемнювати/Z|w(
причеплювати/Z|w
пробурмотати/Z(
прогодуватися/Z
продудоніти/Z
прокомунікувати/ZO
промаркувати/ZO
пропастеризувати/ZO
просвічуватися/Z|w
прострілитися/ZL
протріщати/Z
прошкрябуватися/Z|w
раціоналізуватися/Z|w
ремаркуватися/Z|w
роз'яснювати/Z|w(
розвеселити/ZM
розгубити/ZMO
розіллятися/Z
розконсервуватися/Z
розлежуватися/Z|
розміщуватися/Z|w
розплавити/ZLO
розраяти/Z
розстебнутися/Z
розтушовувати/Z|w
розчіплюватися/Z|w
садонути/Z
самореформуватися/Z
силосувати/Z|wO
складувати/Z|wO(
скоцюбитися/ZL
слюсарювати/Z|w
спаскудитися/ZL
сповнитися/ZM
сприкритися/Z
стекти/Z
стригтися/Z|w
суперфінішувати/Z|w
таксувати/Z|wO
тиркотіти/Z|w
трансформуватися/Z|w
тьохнути/Z
угнітити/Z
узвичаюватися/Z|w
уладнуватися/Z|w
унаявнюватися/Z|w
употужнювати/Z|w
уселитися/ZM
утвердити/ZOM
ухитритися/ZM
фельдшерувати/Z|w
функціонувати/Z|w
храбрувати/Z|w
цямруватися/Z|w
шаркотати/Z|w
шпигувати/Z|wO
